cs: Jiné vlastnosti grafického softwaru: Analytika chování; Cloudové; Šifrování disku; Detekce/odpověď koncového bodu; Firemní firewall; Šifrování souborů; Detekce/prevence narušení; Správa mobilních zařízení; Vícefaktorové ověřování; Další generace; Osobní firewall; Správa bezpečnostních událostí; Jednotné přihlášení; Vhodné pro smartphone/tablet; Virtuální privátní síť; Skener zranitelnosti; Jiné
el: Πρόσθετες λειτουργίες λογισμικού ασφαλείας: Ανάλυση συμπεριφοράς; Βασισμένο στο νέφος; Κρυπτογράφηση δίσκου; Εντοπισμός και απόκριση τελικών σημείων; Τείχος προστασίας επιχειρήσεων; Κρυπτογράφηση αρχείου; Ανίχνευση/αποτροπή εισβολής; Διαχείριση φορητών συσκευών; Έλεγχος ταυτότητας πολλών παραγόντων; Επόμενης γενιάς; Προσωπικό τείχος προστασίας; Διαχείριση συμβάντων ασφάλειας; Ενιαία σύνδεση; Κατάλληλο για smartphone/tablet; Εικονικό ιδιωτικό δίκτυο; Σαρωτής ευπαθειών; Άλλο
es: Características adicionales del software de seguridad: Análisis de comportamiento; Basado en la nube; Encriptación de disco; Detección/respuesta de terminales; Cortafuegos empresarial; Encriptación de archivos; Detección/prevención de intrusiones; Gestión de dispositivos móviles; Autenticación multifactor; Próxima generación; Cortafuegos personal; Gestión de eventos de seguridad; Inicio de sesión único; Apto para teléfonos inteligentes/tabletas; Red privada virtual; Escáner de vulnerabilidades; Otros
fi: Suojausohjelmiston lisäominaisuudet: Käyttäytymisanalytiikka; Pilvipohjainen; Levyn salaus; Päätepisteen tunnistus/vaste; Yrityksen palomuuri; Tiedostojen salaus; Tunkeutumisen havaitseminen/ehkäisy; Mobiililaitteiden hallinta; Monivaiheinen todennus; Seuraava sukupolvi; Henkilökohtainen palomuuri; Turvatapahtumien hallinta; Kertakirjautuminen; Sopii älypuhelimeen/tablettiin; Virtuaalinen erillisverkko (VPN); Haavoittuvuusskanneri; Muu
zh-CN: 其他安全软件功能: 行为分析; 基于云; 磁盘加密; 端点检测/响应; 企业防火墙; 文件加密; 入侵检测/防御; 移动设备管理; 多重身份验证; 下一代; 个人防火墙; 安全事件管理; 单点登录; 适用于智能手机/平板电脑; 虚拟专用网络; 漏洞扫描器; 其他
ru: Дополнительные функции антивирусного программного обеспечения: Поведенческий анализ; Облачный; Шифрование дисков; Обнаружение/отклик конечной точки; Корпоративный брандмауэр; Шифрование файлов; Обнаружение/предотвращение вторжений; Управление мобильными устройствами; Многофакторная проверка подлинности; Следующее поколение; Персональный брандмауэр; Управление событиями безопасности; Единый вход; Подходит для смартфона/планшета; Виртуальная частная сеть; Сканер уязвимостей; Другое
hu: Biztonsági szoftver további funkciói: Viselkedéselemzés; Felhőalapú; Lemeztitkosítás; Végponti észlelés és reagálás; Vállalati tűzfal; Fájltitkosítás; Behatolásérzékelés és -megelőzés; Mobileszköz-kezelés; Többtényezős hitelesítés; Következő generációs; Személyes tűzfal; Biztonsági események kezelése; Egyszeri bejelentkezés; Okostelefonhoz/táblagéphez használható; Virtuális magánhálózat; Sebezhetőség-ellenőrző; Egyéb
fr: Fonctionnalités supplémentaires du logiciel de sécurité: Analyse du comportement; Basé sur le cloud; Chiffrement du disque; Détection/réponse du point de terminaison; Pare-feu d’entreprise; Chiffrement des fichiers; Détection/prévention des intrusions; Gestion des appareils mobiles; Authentification multifacteur; Nouvelle génération; Pare-feu personnel; Gestion des événements de sécurité; Authentification unique; Convient aux smartphones/tablettes; Réseau privé virtuel; Scanner de vulnérabilité; Autre
zh-TW: 附加資安軟體功能: 行為分析; 雲端式; 磁碟加密; 端點偵測/回應; 企業級防火牆; 檔案加密; 入侵偵測/預防; 行動裝置管理; 多重身分驗證; 新一代; 個人防火牆; 安全事件管理; 單一登入; 適用於智慧型手機/平板電腦; 虛擬私人網路; 漏洞掃描器; 其他
pt-PT: Características adicionais de software de segurança: Análise de comportamento; Baseado em nuvem; Encriptação de disco; Deteção/resposta de ponto final; Firewall corporativo; Encriptação de ficheiro; Deteção/prevenção de intrusões; Gestão de dispositivos móveis; Autenticação multifator; Próxima geração; Firewall pessoal; Gestão de eventos de segurança; Início de sessão único; Adequado para smartphone/tablet; Rede Privada Virtual (VPN); Leitor de vulnerabilidades; Outro
nl: Extra functies voor beveiligingssoftware: Gedragsanalyse; Cloudgebaseerd; Schijfversleuteling; Eindpuntdetectie/reactie; Enterprise-firewall; Bestandsversleuteling; Inbraakdetectie/preventie; Beheer van mobiele apparaten; Multi-factor verificatie; Volgende generatie; Persoonlijke firewall; Beheer van beveiligingsgebeurtenissen; Eenmalig inloggen; Geschikt voor smartphone/tablet; Virtueel privénetwerk; Kwetsbaarheidsscanner; Andere
sl-SI: Dodatne funkcije varnostne programske opreme: Analiza vedenja; V oblaku; Šifriranje diska; Zaznavanje končnih točk in odzivanje nanje; Požarni zid podjetja; Šifriranje datotek; Zaznavanje in preprečevanje vdorov; Upravljanje mobilnih naprav; Večfaktorska avtentikacija; Naslednja generacija; Osebni požarni zid; Upravljanje varnostnih dogodkov; Enkratni vpis; Primerno za pametni telefon in tablični računalnik; Virtualno zasebno omrežje; Pregledovalnik ranljivosti; Drugo
sk-SK: Ďalšie funkcie bezpečnostného softvéru: Analytika správania; Cloudové; Šifrovanie disku; Detekcia/reakcia koncového bodu; Firemný firewall; Šifrovanie súborov; Detekcia/prevencia narušenia; Správa mobilných zariadení; Viacfaktorové overenie; Nová generácia; Osobný firewall; Správa bezpečnostných udalostí; Jednotné prihlásenie; Vhodné pre smartfón/tablet; Virtuálna súkromná sieť; Skener zraniteľnosti; Iné
bg-BG: Допълнителни функции на софтуера за сигурност: Анализ на поведението; Базирано на облак; Криптиране на диск; Откриване/отговор на крайна точка; Корпоративна защитна стена; Криптиране на файл; Откриване/предотвратяване на проникване; Управление на мобилни устройства; Многофакторно удостоверяване; Следващо поколение; Персонална защитна стена; Управление на събития за сигурност; Единично влизане; Подходящо за смартфон/таблет; Виртуална частна мрежа; Скенер за уязвимости; Други
ja: その他のセキュリティソフトウェア機能: 行動分析; クラウドベース; ディスクの暗号化; エンドポイントの検出/応答; エンタープライズのファイアウォール; ファイルの暗号化; 侵入検知/防止; モバイルデバイス管理; 多要素認証; 次世代; パーソナルファイアウォール; セキュリティイベント管理; シングル・サインオン; スマートフォン/タブレットに最適; 仮想プライベートネットワーク; 脆弱性スキャナー; その他
hr-HR: Dodatne značajke sigurnosnog softvera: Bihevioralna analitika; U oblaku; Enkripcija diska; Otkrivanje/odgovor krajnje točke; Vatrozid poduzeća; Enkripcija datoteke; Detekcija/prevencija upada; Upravljanje mobilnim uređajima; Višefaktorska autentifikacija; Sljedeća generacija; Osobni vatrozid; Upravljanje sigurnosnim događajima; Jedinstvena prijava; Prikladno za pametni telefon / tablet; Virtualna privatna mreža; Skener za procjenu ranjivosti; Ostalo
pt-BR: Recursos adicionais de software de segurança: Análise de comportamento; Baseado em nuvem; Criptografia de disco; Detecção/resposta de endpoint; Firewall empresarial; Criptografia de arquivo; Detecção/prevenção de intrusões; Gerenciamento de dispositivos móveis; Autenticação multifator; Última geração; Firewall pessoal; Gerenciamento de eventos de segurança; Logon único; Adequado para smartphone/tablet; Rede privada virtual; Leitor de vulnerabilidade; Outro
sv: Ytterligare detaljer för programvara för säkerhet: Beteendeanalys; Molnbaserad; Kryptering; Slutpunktsdetektering/-svar; Enterprise brandvägg; Kryptering av filer; Intrångsdetektering/prevention; Hantering av mobila enheter; Multifaktorautentisering; Nästa generation; Personlig brandvägg; Säkerhetshantering av händelser; Enkel inloggning; Lämplig för smartphone/surfplatta; Virtuellt privat nätverk; Sårbarhetsskanner; Annat
tr: Ek güvenlik yazılımı özellikleri: Davranış analitiği; Bulut tabanlı; Disk şifreleme; Uç nokta algılama/yanıtlama; Kurumsal güvenlik duvarı; Dosya şifreleme; İzinsiz giriş tespiti/önleme; Mobil cihaz yönetimi; Çok faktörlü kimlik doğrulama; Yeni nesil; Kişisel güvenlik duvarı; Güvenlik olay yönetimi; Tekli oturum açma; Akıllı telefon/tablet için uygun; Sanal özel ağ; Güvenlik açığı tarayıcısı; Diğer
pl: Dodatkowe funkcje oprogramowania zabezpieczającego: Analityka behawioralna; Oparty na chmurze; Szyfrowanie dysków; Wykrywanie/odpowiedź punktu końcowego; Zapora przedsiębiorstwa; Szyfrowanie plików; Wykrywanie włamań / zapobieganie włamaniom; Zarządzanie urządzeniami mobilnymi; Uwierzytelnianie wieloskładnikowe; Następnej generacji; Zapora osobista; Zarządzanie zdarzeniami związanymi z bezpieczeństwem; Pojedyncze logowanie; Nadaje się do smartfonów/tabletów; Wirtualna sieć prywatna; Skaner podatności; Pozostałe
vi: Các tính năng phần mềm bảo mật bổ sung: Phân tích hành vi; Dựa trên đám mây; Mã hóa ổ đĩa; Phát hiện/phản hồi điểm cuối; Tường lửa doanh nghiệp; Mã hóa tập tin; Phát hiện/ngăn chặn xâm nhập; Quản lý thiết bị di động; Xác thực đa yếu tố; Thế hệ kế tiếp; Tường lửa cá nhân; Quản lý sự kiện bảo mật; Đăng nhập một lần; Phù hợp với điện thoại thông minh/máy tính bảng; Mạng riêng ảo; Trình quét lỗ hổng; Khác
de: Zusätzliche Funktionen der Sicherheitssoftware: Verhaltensanalyse; Cloudbasiert; Festplattenverschlüsselung; Endpunkterkennung/-antwort; Firewall der Enterprise-Klasse; Dateiverschlüsselung; Angriffserkennung/-prävention; Mobile Geräteverwaltung; Multi-Faktor-Authentifizierung; Next-gen; Persönliche Firewall; Sicherheitsereignisverwaltung; Einmalige Anmeldung; Geeignet für Smartphone/Tablet; Virtuelles privates Netzwerk; Schwachstellenscanner; Sonstiges
da: Yderligere funktioner for sikkerhedssoftware: Adfærdsanalyse; Cloud-baseret; Diskkryptering; Endpoint – detektion/respons; Enterprise-firewall; Filkryptering; Intrusionsdetektion/-forebyggelse; Administration af mobilenheder; Flerfaktor-autentisering; Næste generation; Personlig firewall; Håndtering af sikkerhedshændelser; Single sign-on; Velegnet til smartphone/tablet; Virtual Private Network (VPN); Sårbarhedsscanner; Andet
nb: Tilleggsfunksjoner for sikkerhetsprogramvare: Atferdsanalyse; Skybasert; Diskkryptering; Endepunktdeteksjon/-respons; Virksomhetsbrannmur; Filkryptering; Inntrengningsdeteksjon/-forebygging; Administrering av mobilenheter; Multi-faktorautentisering; Neste generasjon; Personlig brannmur; Håndtering av sikkerhetshendelser; Enkel pålogging; Egnet for smarttelefon/nettbrett; Virtuelt privat nettverk; Sårbarhetsskanner; Annen
ko: 추가 보안 소프트웨어 기능: 행동 분석; 클라우드 기반; 디스크 암호화; 엔드포인트 탐지/대응; 기업 방화벽; 파일 암호화; 침입 탐지/방지; 모바일 장치 관리; 다단계 인증; 다음 세대; 개인방화벽; 보안 이벤트 관리; 싱글 사인온(SSO); 스마트폰/태블릿에 적합; 가상 사설망(VPN); 취약점 스캐너; 기타
en: Additional security software features: Behavior analytics; Cloud-based; Disk encryption; Endpoint detection/response; Enterprise firewall; File encryption; Intrusion detection/prevention; Mobile device management; Multi-factor authentication; Next-generation; Personal firewall; Security event management; Single sign-on; Suitable for smartphone/tablet; Virtual private network; Vulnerability scanner; Other
lt-LT: Papildomos saugos programinės įrangos funkcijos: Elgesio analizė; Debesijos pagrindas; Disko šifravimas; Grėsmių aptikimo galiniuose įrenginiuose ir reagavimo sprendinys; Įmonės ugniasienė; Failų šifravimas; Įsibrovimų aptikimas / prevencija; Mobiliųjų įrenginių valdymas; Daugiaveiksnis tapatumo nustatymas; Naujos kartos; Asmeninė ugniasienė; Saugumo įvykių valdymas; Vieno prisijungimo principas; Tinka išmaniajam telefonui / planšetei; Virtualusis privatusis tinklas; Pažeidžiamumo skaitytuvas; Kita
th: คุณลักษณะเพิ่มเติมของซอฟต์แวร์รักษาความปลอดภัย: การวิเคราะห์พฤติกรรม; แบบระบบคลาวด์; การเข้ารหัสดิสก์; การตรวจจับ/การตอบสนองปลายทาง; ไฟร์วอลล์องค์กร; การเข้ารหัสไฟล์; การตรวจจับ/ป้องกันการบุกรุก; การจัดการอุปกรณ์เคลื่อนที่; การรับรองความถูกต้องแบบหลายปัจจัย; รุ่นต่อไป; ไฟร์วอลล์ส่วนบุคคล; การจัดการเหตุการณ์การรักษาความปลอดภัย; การลงชื่อเข้าระบบแบบครั้งเดียว; เหมาะสำหรับสมาร์ทโฟน/แท็บเล็ต; เครือข่ายส่วนตัวเสมือน; โปรแกรมสแกนช่องโหว่; อื่นๆ
it: Funzionalità aggiuntive del software di sicurezza: Analisi del comportamento; Basato sul cloud; Crittografia disco; Rilevamento/risposta dell'endpoint; Firewall aziendale; Crittografiafile; Rilevamento/prevenzione delle intrusioni; Gestione dei dispositivi mobili; Autenticazione a più fattori; Prossima generazione; Firewall personale; Gestione eventi di sicurezza; Single sign-on; Adatto per smartphone/tablet; Rete privata virtuale (VPN); Scanner delle vulnerabilità; Altro
ro-RO: Funcții suplimentare software de securitate: Analiza comportamentului; În cloud; Criptarea discurilor; Detectarea/răspunsul punctului final; Firewall pentru companii și organizații; Criptarea fișierelor; Detectarea/prevenirea intruziunilor; Gestionarea dispozitivelor mobile; Autentificare cu mai mulți factori; De următoarea generație; Firewall personal; Managementul evenimentelor de securitate; Autentificare unică; Potrivit pentru smartphone/tabletă; Rețea privată virtuală; Scanner de vulnerabilități; Altele